Utah statutes.
16-10a-823.   Waiver of notice.
(1)  A director may waive any notice of a meeting before or after the date and
time of the meeting stated in the notice.  Except as provided by Subsection
(2), the waiver must be in writing and signed by the director entitled to the
notice.  The waiver shall be delivered to the corporation for filing with the
corporate records, but delivery and filing are not conditions to its
effectiveness.
(2)  A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any
required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the
beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, objects to
holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of
notice or defective notice, and does not thereafter vote for or assent to
action taken at the meeting.
